Utah statutes.
35A-1-202.   Divisions -- Creation -- Duties -- Workforce Appeals Board, councils, Child Care Advisory Committee, and regional services areas.

(1)  There is created within the department the following divisions:

(a)  the Employment Development Division to administer the development and implementation of employment assistance programs that are:

(i)  related to the operations of the department; and

(ii)  consistent with federal and state law;

(b)  to administer those services that are not delivered through the regional workforce services areas:

(i)  the Workforce Development and Information Division; and

(ii)  the Unemployment Insurance Division; and

(c)  the Division of Adjudication to adjudicate claims or actions in accordance with this title.

(2)  In addition to the divisions created under this section, within the department are the following:

(a)  the Workforce Appeals Board created in Section 35A-1-205;

(b)  the State Council on Workforce Services created in Section 35A-1-206;

(c)  the Employment Advisory Council created in Section 35A-4-502;

(d)  the Child Care Advisory Committee created in Section 35A-3-205; and

(e)  the regional workforce services areas and councils created in accordance with Chapter 2, Regional Workforce Services Areas.

